src/fst/morphology/affixes/propernouns.lexc
! Ordbank mapping in stems: 79B -> PROP
LEXICON 79B
 +Prop+Msc:%> # ;

! Ordbank mapping in stems: 89B -> PROP
LEXICON 89B
 +Prop+Neu:%> # ;

! Ordbank mapping in stems: 994 -> PROP
LEXICON 994
 +Prop:%> # ;

! Ordbank mapping in stems: 997 -> PROP
LEXICON 997
 +Prop:%> # ;

! Ordbank mapping in stems: 998 -> PROP
LEXICON 998
 +Prop:%> # ;

! Ordbank mapping in stems: 99A -> PROP
LEXICON 99A
 +Prop+Fem:%> # ;

! Ordbank mapping in stems: 99B -> PROP
LEXICON 99B
 +Prop+Fem:%> # ;
